Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
STATE LOW-INCOME HOUSING

A. State
Low-Income Housing; Administration

[§356D-41] Definitions. As used in
this subpart, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

"Administer" or
"administration" means the management, operation, maintenance, and
regulation of any state low-income housing project. It also includes any and
all undertakings necessary therefor.

"Veteran" includes any person who
served in the military or naval forces of the United States during World War II
and who has been discharged or released therefrom under conditions other than
dishonorable. The term "veteran" also includes Filipino World War II
veterans who served honorably in an active duty status under the command of the
United States Armed Forces in the Far East (USAFFE), or within the Philippine
Army, the Philippine Scouts, or recognized guerilla units. The Filipino World
War II veterans must have: served at any time between September 1, 1939,
and December 31, 1946; been born in the Philippines; and resided in the Philippines prior to the military service. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next